Utah statutes.
36-20-3.   Submission of court rules or proposals for court rules.

(1)  Each court rule or proposal for court rule and any other information the Supreme Court or Judicial Council considers relevant and helpful shall be submitted to the committee and the governor at each stage when:

(a)  the court rule or proposal for court rule is submitted to:

(i)  the Judicial Council for consideration or approval for public comment; or

(ii)  the Supreme Court from the advisory committee after its consideration or approval; and

(b)  the approved court rule or approved proposal for court rule is made available to members of the bar and the public for public comment.

(2)  At the time of submission under Subsection (1), the Supreme Court or Judicial Council shall provide the committee with the name and telephone number of a Supreme Court advisory committee or Judicial Council employee who may be contacted about the submission.

